Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 13. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 45.45.900.
Indemnification agreements against public policy.

A provision, clause, covenant, or agreement contained in, collateral to, or affecting a construction contract that purports to indemnify the promisee against liability for damages for (1) death or bodily injury to persons, (2) injury to property, (3) design defects, or (4) other loss, damage or expense arising under (1), (2), or (3) of this section from the sole negligence or wilful misconduct of the promisee or the promisee’s agents, servants, or independent contractors who are directly responsible to the promisee, is against public policy and is void and unenforceable; however, this provision does not affect the validity of an insurance contract, workers’ compensation, or agreement issued by an insurer subject to the provisions of AS 21, or a provision, clause, covenant, or agreement of indemnification respecting the handling, containment, or cleanup of oil or hazardous substances as defined in AS 46.

History.

(§ 1 ch 155 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 59 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.47.010. Renumbered in 1980.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The apparent prohibition on indemnification agreements in construction contracts found in this section will only apply when the promissee is completely negligent and seeks to hold an innocent promisor accountable. February 27, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 45.45.905.
Transportation services contracts; indemnification agreements prohibited.

A motor carrier and a shipping person may not, with regard to a transportation services contract, agree that

the motor carrier will indemnify, defend, or hold the shipping person harmless, or agree to a provision that has the effect of indemnifying, defending, or holding a shipping person harmless, from claims or liability for the negligence, intentional acts, or intentional omissions of the shipping person; or

the shipping person will indemnify, defend, or hold the motor carrier harmless, or agree to a provision that has the effect of indemnifying, defending, or holding a motor carrier harmless, from claims or liability for the negligence, intentional acts, or intentional omissions of the motor carrier.

An agreement that violates (a) of this section is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.

This section does not apply to the Uniform Intermodal Interchange and Facilities Access Agreement administered by the Intermodal Association of North America or to another agreement that provides for the interchange, use, or possession of intermodal chassis, intermodal containers, or other intermodal equipment.

In this section,

“motor carrier” means a person who is engaged in the transportation of property for compensation by motor vehicle, and includes an agent, employee, servant, or independent contractor of the motor carrier if the agent, employee, servant, or independent contractor provides services in connection with the particular transportation services contract to which (a) of this section is being applied;

“motor vehicle” has the meaning given in AS

28.90.990

, except that the motor vehicle must have a gross weight rating or gross combination weight rating that is greater than 10,000 pounds;

“shipping person” means a person who enters into a transportation services contract to use the services of a motor carrier, and includes an agent, employee, servant, or independent contractor of the shipping person if the agent, employee, servant, or independent contractor provides services in connection with the particular transportation services contract to which (a) of this section is being applied;

“transportation services” means

the transportation of property;

entry on property to load, unload, or transport property; or

providing a service, including the packing or storage of property, incidental to (A) or (B) of this paragraph.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 21, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, is effective August 25, 2010.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 2, ch. 21, SLA 2010, this section “does not apply to an agreement to indemnify, defend, or hold a shipping person or a motor carrier harmless unless the agreement is entered into on or after August 25, 2010.”

Sec. 45.45.910.
Sale or transfer of consumer electrical products.

Unless exempted by the department under (d) of this section, a person may not sell, offer to sell, or otherwise transfer in the course of the person’s business a consumer electrical product that is manufactured after August 14, 1990, unless the product is clearly marked as being listed by an approved third-party certification program.

A person may not sell, offer to sell, or otherwise transfer in the course of the person’s business a consumer electrical product that is manufactured before August 14, 1990, unless the product is clearly marked

as being listed by an approved third-party certification program; or

with a warning label that complies with (e) of this section.

A person may not sell, offer to sell, or otherwise transfer in the course of the person’s business a consumer electrical product that has been exempted under (d) of this section, unless the product is clearly marked with a warning label that complies with (e) of this section.

If a consumer electrical product is a work of art or an item that has an unusual application that makes approval by a third-party certification program not reasonably available, the department shall upon request exempt the item from (a) of this section. The department shall establish by regulation guidelines to identify consumer electrical products that qualify for an exemption under this section.

The warning label required by this section must be a brightly colored label that contains in simple, direct language a warning that the electrical product is not listed by an approved third-party certification program. The department shall adopt regulations establishing the exact content, color, design, and use of the warning label.

Unless a later version has been adopted by the department by regulation, a certification program must meet the requirements of ANSI Z-34.1 — 1987, American National Standards for Certification — Third-Party Certification Program, published by the American National Standards Institute, in order to qualify as an approved third-party certification program under this section. The department may adopt by regulation later versions of the American National Standards for Certification — Third-Party Certification Program, as the standard for third-party certification programs under this section. If the department has adopted a later version, a certification program must meet the requirements of the most recent version adopted by the department in order to qualify as an approved third-party certification program under this section.

In this section,

“approved third-party certification program” means a program that qualifies under (f) of this section;

“consumer electrical product” means an electrical product that is marketed for and commonly purchased by the general public and that is

an assembled device that has an electrical circuit that operates at 110 volts AC or higher, except for mechanical attachments, including pump heads, pulleys, and fan blades, that are used in the application of the device;

a device that when assembled has an electrical circuit that operates at 110 volts AC or higher; or

an individual component part that is intended to be part of an electrical circuit that operates at 110 volts AC or higher;

“department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (g) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For violation of (a), (b), or (c) of this section as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.

Sec. 45.45.920.
Free trial period.

Notwithstanding a provision in AS 45.02 to the contrary, a seller may not offer, promote, advertise, or provide a consumer with goods or services for a free trial period unless the seller complies with all the conditions of this section.

When offering, promoting, or advertising consumer goods or services for a free trial period, a seller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose all material terms and conditions of the free trial period, including

all material restrictions, limitations, terms, and conditions of the free trial period, including any obligation by the consumer to purchase a minimum quantity of goods or services after the free trial period ends;

a description of all charges that will be imposed after the free trial period ends, including whether billing will include charges for shipping and handling and, if the offer, promotion, or advertising is made by telephone, the amount of the shipping and handling charges;

a description of the consumer’s right to cancel; and

any other obligations the consumer assumes by accepting or using the goods or services during the free trial period.

Before providing goods or services to a consumer for a free trial period, a seller shall obtain express verifiable consent from the consumer to the free trial period.

A consumer who receives goods or services for a free trial period may

at any time during the free trial period, return the goods or cancel the services without further obligation to the seller;

within 30 days after the free trial period ends, return the goods or cancel the services for a full refund of the charges, if any, or a partial refund for the unused portion of the goods or services.

This section does not apply to a seller who provides goods or services to a consumer for free if the consumer does not assume any obligation by accepting the free goods or services.

This section does not apply to

a telephonic seller who is registered under AS 45.63 and who complies with AS 45.63; or

a prenotification negative option plan that is regulated by 16 C.F.R. Part 425 and that complies with 16 C.F.R. Part 425.

In this section, “seller” means a person who engages in the business of selling, contracting for the sale of, arranging for the sale of, or arranging for a free trial period for goods or services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 2004; am § 45 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For violation of this section as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (f)(2), twice substituted “16 C.F.R. Part 425” for “16 C.F.R. 425”.

Sec. 45.45.930.
Opt-out marketing plans.

Notwithstanding a provision in AS 45.02 to the contrary, a seller may not use an opt-out marketing plan to sell goods or services unless the seller complies with all of the provisions of this section.

Before using an opt-out marketing plan, a seller shall obtain express verifiable consent from the buyer that confirms that the buyer agrees to the use of the plan. The seller shall provide the following information before obtaining the consent:

a description of the material terms and conditions of the plan, including a description of the goods or services that will be offered;

that the buyer’s account will be charged unless the buyer takes an affirmative action to avoid the charge;

the date the charge will be submitted for payment; and

the specific steps the buyer must take to avoid the charge.

A seller who charges a buyer for goods or services under an opt-out marketing plan has the burden of proving that the buyer provided the express verifiable consent required by (b) of this section and was given the disclosures required by (b) of this section.

This section does not apply to a telephonic seller who is registered under AS 45.63 and who complies with AS 45.63.

In this section,

“opt-out marketing plan”

means an arrangement under which a seller provides, without the buyer’s express verifiable consent, a notice to a buyer that identifies goods or services that the seller intends to provide to the buyer and to charge the buyer for, unless, by a specific date or within a specific time frame, the buyer notifies the seller not to provide the goods or services;

does not include a prenotification negative option plan that is regulated by and complies with 16 C.F.R. Part 425;

“seller” includes a person who engages in the business of selling, contracting for the sale of, or arranging for the sale of goods or services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 2004; am § 46 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For violation of this section as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (e)(1)(B), substituted “16 C.F.R. Part 425” for “16 C.F.R. 425”.